Maryland, session 2026, HB0762.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
2–501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0762*

HOUSE BILL 762
(b) (1) “Facial recognition technology” means a computer program, a service,
or any other technology that analyzes facial features and is used by or at the direction of a
law enforcement agency for the identification, verification, or persistent tracking of
individuals in still or video images for use in criminal investigations.
(2) “Facial recognition technology” does not include technology:
(i) used only for the analysis of facial features to grant or deny
access to an electronic device; or
(ii) that uses an automated or semiautomated process only for the
purpose of redacting a recording or an image for release or disclosure outside a law
enforcement agency to protect the privacy of a subject depicted in the recording or image if
the process does not generate or result in the retention of any biometric data or surveillance
information.
(c) “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning stated in § 2–101 of the Public
Safety Article.
2–503.
(a) (1) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A police officer or other employee or agent of a law enforcement agency may
not, in the furtherance of a criminal investigation:
(i) use facial recognition technology to investigate a crime other
than the commission of or the attempt to commit:
1. a crime of violence as defined in § 14–101 of the Criminal
Law Article;
2. a human trafficking offense under Title 3, Subtitle 11 of
the Criminal Law Article;
3. first– or second–degree child abuse under § 3–601 of the
Criminal Law Article;
4. a child pornography offense under § 11–207 of the
Criminal Law Article;
5. a hate crime under § 10–304 of the Criminal Law Article;
6. a weapon crime under § 4–102, § 4–103, § 4–203(a)(1)(iii)
or (iv), § 4–204, or § 4–303(a)(2) of the Criminal Law Article;
7. a weapon crime under § 5–138, § 5–140, § 5–141, §
5–207(c)(16), § 5–406(a)(3), or § 5–703(a) of the Public Safety Article;

HOUSE BILL 762 3
8. aggravated cruelty to animals under § 10–606 or § 10–607
of the Criminal Law Article;
9. importation of fentanyl or a fentanyl analogue under §
5–614(a)(1)(xii) of the Criminal Law Article;
10. stalking under § 3–802 of the Criminal Law Article;
11. a criminal act involving circumstances presenting a
substantial and ongoing threat to public safety or national security; or
12. a crime under the laws of another state substantially
equivalent to a crime listed in items 1 through 10 of this item involving a fugitive from
justice charged with a crime in that state and sought under Title 9 of this article;
(ii) analyze an image or a recording of an individual:
1. engaged in activity protected under the United States
Constitution, the Maryland Constitution, or the Maryland Declaration of Rights, unless
there is reasonable suspicion to believe that the individual has committed, is in the process
of committing, or is about to commit a crime; or
2. who is not intended to be identified;
(iii) use facial recognition technology to analyze a sketch or manually
produced image;
(iv) disclose to a witness in the criminal investigation, prior to the
witness participating in a live identification or photo array identification, that a particular
suspect or image of a suspect was identified using facial recognition technology; or
(v) use facial recognition technology for the purpose of live or
real–time identification of an image or a recording.
(2) (I) IN THIS PARAGRAPH, “DWELLING” MEANS A STRUCTURE
ANY PART OF WHICH HAS BEEN ADAPTED FOR OVERNIGHT ACCOMMODATION OF AN
INDIVIDUAL REGARDLESS OF WHETHER AN INDIVIDUAL IS ACTUALLY PRESENT.
(II) IF A STILL OR VIDEO IMAGE WAS CAPTURED BY A CAMERA
AFFIXED TO THE EXTERIOR OF A DWELLING BY THE OWNER OR LAWFUL TENANT OF
THE DWELLING, A POLICE OFFICER OR OTHER EMPLOYEE OR AGENT OF A LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCY MAY USE FACIAL RECOGNITION TECHNOLOGY TO
INVESTIGATE THE COMMISSION OF OR THE ATTEMPT TO COMMIT:

HOUSE BILL 762
1. ARSON IN THE FIRST DEGREE UNDER § 6–102 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
2. ARSON IN THE SECOND DEGREE UNDER § 6–103 OF
THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
3. BURGLARY IN THE FIRST DEGREE UNDER § 6–202 OF
THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
4. BURGLARY IN THE SECOND DEGREE UNDER § 6–203
OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
5. BURGLARY IN THE THIRD DEGREE UNDER § 6–204 OF
THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
6. BURGLARY IN THE FOURTH DEGREE UNDER § 6–205
OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
7. BREAKING AND ENTERING MOTOR VEHICLE – ROGUE
AND VAGABOND UNDER § 6–206 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
8. TRESPASS ON POSTED PROPERTY UNDER § 6–402 OF
THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
9. WANTON TRESPASS ON PRIVATE PROPERTY UNDER §
6–403 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
10. USE OF A VEHICLE ON PRIVATE PROPERTY UNDER §
6–404 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE;
11. WANTON ENTRY ON CULTIVATED LAND UNDER §
6–406 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE; OR
12. ENTRY ON PROPERTY FOR PURPOSE OF INVADING
PRIVACY OF OCCUPANTS UNDER § 6–408 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
[(2)] (3) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph,
an image being evaluated using facial recognition technology may be compared only to
images contained in:
1. the database of images of driver’s license and
identification card photos maintained by the Motor Vehicle Administration or the
department of motor vehicles of another state; or

HOUSE BILL 762 5
2. a database of mugshot photos maintained by a local, State,
or federal law enforcement agency or a law enforcement agency of another country.
(ii) An image being evaluated using facial recognition technology
may be compared to an image contained in a database other than a database described in
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph if:
1. the law enforcement agency conducting the investigation
has entered into an agreement with the entity that maintains the database governing the
methods by which images in the database are collected; and
2. the agreement provides that the agreement will be
terminated in the event that the entity maintaining the database commits a material
breach of the provisions governing the methods by which images in the database are
collected.
[(3)] (4) Before being used for any purpose in relation to a criminal
investigation, a result generated by facial recognition technology shall be independently
verified by an individual who has completed training in accordance with § 2–505 of this
subtitle.
(b) A police officer or other employee or agent of a law enforcement agency may
not use facial recognition technology to identify an individual solely based on:
(1) the police officer’s, employee’s, or agent’s personal interest not related
to legitimate duties or objectives of the law enforcement agency;
(2) the individual’s political or social beliefs or activities;
(3) the individual’s participation in lawful activities; or
(4) the individual’s race, color, religious beliefs, sexual orientation, gender,
disability, national origin, or status as being homeless.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection and subject to
paragraph (3) of this subsection, a result generated by facial recognition technology in
violation of this section and all other evidence subsequently derived from the result may
not be introduced by the State for any purpose in a criminal court proceeding or in a juvenile
court proceeding under Title 3, Subtitle 8A of the Courts Article.
(2) Evidence derived from a result generated in violation of subsection
(a)(1) OR (2) of this section may be introduced for a purpose described in § 2–502 of this
subtitle if the court finds that the evidence would otherwise be subject to a legally valid
exception to the exclusionary rule.

HOUSE BILL 762
(3) This subsection may not be construed to allow the use of a result
generated using facial recognition technology to be introduced as evidence in a criminal
trial or in an adjudicatory hearing held under § 3–8A–18 of the Courts Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.